Utah statutes.
17-15-27.   Appointment of legal counsel by county executive and county
legislative body.
(1) (a)  An elected county executive in a county that has adopted a county
executive-council form of county government under Chapter 52, Changing Forms
of County Government, may appoint an attorney to advise and represent the
county executive.
(b)  An attorney appointed under Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  serves at the pleasure of the county executive; and
(ii)  may not perform any of the functions of a county attorney or district
attorney under this title, except as provided in this section.
(c)  An attorney appointed under this Subsection (1) may represent the county
executive in cases and controversies before courts and administrative agencies
and tribunals when a conflict exists that precludes the county or district
attorney from representing the county executive.
(2) (a)  The legislative body of a county that has adopted a county executive-
council form of county government under Chapter 52, Changing Forms of County
Government, may appoint an attorney to advise and represent the county
legislative body.
(b)  An attorney appointed under Subsection (2)(a):
(i)  serves at the pleasure of the county legislative body; and
(ii)  may not perform any of the functions of a county attorney or district
attorney under this title, except as provided in this section.
(c)  An attorney appointed under this Subsection (2) may represent the county
legislative body in cases and controversies before courts and administrative
agencies and tribunals when a conflict exists that precludes the county or
district attorney from representing the county legislative body.
